Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-908
License; issuance; conditions.

The director shall issue a license to an applicant, if, after public hearing and any investigation of the applicant, the director determines that:

(1) The experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and its officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or members are such as to warrant the belief that the applicant will conduct the delayed deposit services business honestly, fairly, and efficiently;

(2) The applicant and its officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or members have not been convicted of a felony in this state or any other jurisdiction which would indicate moral turpitude on the part of the applicant;

(3) The applicant is financially responsible and will conduct the delayed deposit services business pursuant to the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act; and

(4) The applicant has assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars available for operating the delayed deposit services business.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 8.